North Dakota, session 69, HB1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Review of legislative measures - Tribal consultation.
1. Each legislative session, the director of the Indian affairs commission shall review
each measure introduced to the legislative assembly and determine if the measure
pertains to matters with tribal implications.
2. If the director determines a bill pertains to matters with tribal implications, the director
shall consult with the tribal chairpersons of each tribe .
3. For purposes of this section:
a. "Consult" means the direct and interactive involvement of the North Dakota tribal
governments in the development of policy on matters with tribal implications,
which includes a proactive, affirmative process of identifying and seeking input
from appropriate tribal governments and considering the tribal governments' input
as a necessary and integral part of the decisionmaking process.
b. "Matters with tribal implications" means a legislative measure that has a
substantial direct effect on one or more tribal nations within the geographical
boundaries of the state or on the distribution of power and responsibilities
between the state and tribal governments.
Page No. 1 25.0932.02000